th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > การสื่อสาร > การโทรศัพท์ > อุปกรณ์เสริมโทรศัพท์มือถือและสมาร์ทโฟน > อุปกรณ์เสริมกล้องโทรศัพท์เคลื่อนที่: กิมบอลและไม้กันสั่น; กริปและกรง; ฟิลเตอร์เลนส์; ขาตั้งเลนส์และวงแหวนอะแดปเตอร์; ตัวป้องกันเลนส์; เลนส์; ชุดไฟ; ชัตเตอร์ระยะไกล; ไลท์วงแหวน; ไม้เซลฟี่
nb: Elektronikk > Kommunikasjon > Telefoni > Mobiltelefontilbehør > Tilbehør til mobiltelefonkameraer: Kardanske opphengninger og  stabilisatorer; Grep og bur; Objektivfiltre; Linsefester og adapterringer; Linsebeskyttere; Linser; Lyssett; Eksterne lukkere; Ringlys; Selfie-pinner
hu: Elektronika > Kommunikáció > Telefonálás > Mobil- és okostelefon-kiegészítők > Mobiltelefonkamera-kiegészítők: Gimballok és stabilizátorok; Markolatok és védőkeretek; Lencseszűrők; Objektívtartók és adaptergyűrűk; Lencsevédők; Lencsék; Világítókészletek; Távoli redőnyök; Körfények; Szelfibotok
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Comunicações > Telefonia > Acessórios para celulares e smartphones > Acessórios para câmera de celular: Gimbals e estabilizadores; Grips e cages; Filtros para lentes; Suportes de lente e anéis adaptadores; Protetores de lentes; Lentes; Kits de iluminação; Obturadores remotos; Luzes de anel; Bastões de selfie
bg-BG: Електроника > Комуникации > Телефония > Аксесоари за мобилни и смарттелефони > Аксесоари за камери на мобилни телефони: Гимбали и стабилизатори; Стяги и клетки; Филтри за обективи; Стойки и адаптерни пръстени за обектив; Протектори за обективи; Обективи; Комплекти за осветление; Дистанционни управления на камера на телефон; Ринг лампи; Селфи стикове
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Comunicações > Telefonia > Acessórios para telemóvel e smartphones > Acessórios de câmara para telemóvel: Gimbals e estabilizadores; Suportes e caixas; Filtros para lentes; Suportes e anéis adaptadores para lentes; Protetores de lentes; Lentes; Kits de iluminação; Obturadores remotos; Ring lights; Bastões de selfie
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Επικοινωνίες > Τηλεφωνία > Αξεσουάρ κινητών και έξυπνων τηλεφώνων > Αξεσουάρ κάμερας κινητών τηλεφώνων: Gimbals & Σταθεροποιητές; Λαβές & πλαίσια στήριξης; Φίλτρα φακών; Βάσεις φακών & δακτύλιοι προσαρμογής; Προστατευτικά φακών; Φακοί (Lenses); Σετ φωτισμού; Ασύρματα κλείστρα; Φώτα δακτυλίου; Μονόποδα αυτοφωτογράφησης (σέλφι)
ja: 電子機器 > 通信機器 > 電話 > 携帯電話・スマートフォン用アクセサリー > 携帯電話・スマートフォン内蔵カメラ用アクセサリー: ジンバル・スタビライザー; グリップ・ケージ; レンズフィルター; レンズマウント・アダプターリング; レンズプロテクター; レンズ; 照明キット; リモートシャッター; リングライト; 自撮り棒
pl: Elektronika > Telekomunikacja > Telefonia > Akcesoria do telefonów komórkowych i smartfonów > Akcesoria fotograficzne do telefonów komórkowych: Gimbale i stabilizatory; Uchwyty i klatki; Filtry do obiektywów; Mocowania obiektywu i pierścienie adaptacyjne; Osłony obiektywów; Obiektywy; Zestawy oświetleniowe; Zdalne migawki; Pierścieniowe światła; Kijki do selfie
cs: Elektronika > Komunikace > Telefony > Příslušenství pro mobilní a chytré telefony > Příslušenství k fotoaparátům mobilních telefonů: Gimbaly a stabilizátory; Držáky a klece; Filtry na objektivy; Bajonety objektivů a adaptéry; Chrániče objektivů; Objektivy; Osvětlovací soupravy; Dálkové spouště; Kruhová světla; Selfie tyče
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị liên lạc > Điện thoại > Phụ kiện điện thoại di động & điện thoại thông minh > Phụ kiện camera điện thoại di động: Gimbal và thiết bị chống rung; Tay cầm và khung giữ; Bộ lọc ống kính; Giá ống kính và vòng chuyển đổi; Tấm bảo vệ ống kính; Ống kính; Bộ đèn chiếu sáng; Điều khiển chụp ảnh từ xa; Đèn vòng; Gậy tự sướng
ru: Электроника > Связь > Телефония > Аксессуары для мобильных телефонов и смартфонов > Аксессуары для камер мобильных телефонов: Подвесы и стабилизаторы; Ручки и каркасы; Светофильтры для объективов; Крепления для объективов и адаптерные кольца; Защитные крышки для объективов; Объективы; Подсветка; Пульты дистанционного спуска затвора; Кольцевые светильники; Моноподы для селфи
fr: Appareil électronique > Communications > Téléphonie > Accessoires pour téléphones portables et smartphones > Objectifs de téléphones portables: Cardans et stabilisateurs; Poignées et cages; Filtres d’objectif; Supports et bagues d’adaptation d’objectif; Protections d’objectif; Lentilles; Kits d’éclairage; Volets à distance; Anneaux lumineux; Perches à selfie
fi: Elektroniikka > Viestintä > Puhelinliikenne > Matka- ja älypuhelinten tarvikkeet > Matkapuhelimen kameran tarvikkeet: Gimbaalit ja stabilisaattorit; Kahvat ja kehykset; Linssisuotimet; Linssin kiinnikkeet ja sovitinrenkaat; Linssinsuojat; Objektiivit; Valaistussarjat; Etäsulkimet; Kehävalot; Selfietikut
sl-SI: Elektronika > Komunikacija > Telefonija > Dodatki za mobilne in pametne telefone > Dodatki za kamere mobilnih telefonov: Gimbali in stabilizatorji; Ročaji in kletke; Filtri za objektive; Nosilci objektivov in adapterjski obročki; Zaščite za leče; Leče; Kompleti za razsvetljavo; Daljinska prožila; Obročna svetila; Palica za selfije
hr-HR: Elektronika > Komunikacija > Telefonija > Dodaci za mobitele i pametne telefone > Dodaci za kamere za mobilne telefone: Gimbali i stabilizatori; Držači i okviri; Filtri za objektive; Nosači i adapteri prstena za objektive; Zaštite za objektive; Leće; Kompleti za rasvjetu; Daljinski okidači; Prstenasta svjetla; Štapovi za selfije
da: Elektronik > Kommunikation > Telefoni > Mobiltelefon- og smartphonetilbehør > Objektiver til mobiltelefonkameraer: Gimbals og stabilisatorer; Greb og etuier; Objektivfiltre; Objektivbeslag og adapterringe; Objektivbeskyttere; Objektiver; Belysningssæt; Fjernlukkere; Ringbelysning; Selfiestænger
lt-LT: Elektronika > Ryšiai > Telefonija > Mobiliųjų ir išmaniųjų telefonų priedai > Mobiliųjų telefonų kamerų priedai: Kardanai ir stabilizatoriai; Rankenos ir dėklai; Objektyvų filtrai; Objektyvų laikikliai ir adapterio žiedai; Objektyvų apsaugos; Objektyvai; Apšvietimo rinkiniai; Nuotoliniai užrakto valdymo pultai; Žiedinės lempos; Asmenukių lazdos
ko: 전자기기 > 통신 > 전화 > 휴대전화/스마트폰 부대용품 > 휴대전화 카메라 부대용품: 짐벌 및 스태빌라이저; 그립 및 케이지; 렌즈 필터; 렌즈 마운트 및 어댑터 링; 렌즈 보호대; 렌즈; 조명 키트; 원격 셔터; 링 라이트; 셀카봉
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 通讯 > 电话 > 手机和智能手机配件 > 手机摄像头配件: 云台和稳定器; 握把和机架; 镜头滤镜; 镜头支架和转接环; 镜头保护膜; 镜头; 照明套件; 遥控快门; 环形灯; 自拍杆
ro-RO: Electronice > Comunicații > Telefonie > Accesorii pentru telefoane mobile și inteligente > Accesorii camere telefon mobil: Articulații cardanice și stabilizatoare; Mânere și cuști; Filtre pentru obiective; Suporturi pentru lentile și inele adaptoare; Protecții pentru obiectiv; Obiective; Seturi de iluminat; Obturatoare cu comandă de la distanță; Lumini inelare; Bastoane telescopice pentru selfie-uri
sv: Elektronik > Kommunikation > Telefoni > Mobil- och smarttelefontillbehör > Linser för mobiltelefonkameror: Gimbaler och stabilisatorer; Grepp och burar; Linsfilter; Objektivfästen och adapterringar; Linsskydd; Linser; Belysningsenheter; Fjärrstyrda slutare; Ringljus; Selfie-sticks
nl: Elektronica > Communicatie > Telefonie > Accessoires voor mobiele en slimme telefoons > Camera-accessoires voor mobiele telefoons: Gimbals en stabilisatoren; Grepen en kooien; Lensfilters; Lens bevestigingen en adapterringen; Lensbeschermers; Lenzen; Verlichtingskits; Remote shutters; Ringlampen; Selfiesticks
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 通訊設備 > 電話設備 > 手機和智慧型手機配件 > 手機鏡頭配件: 雲台與穩定器; 握把與保護籠; 鏡頭濾鏡; 鏡頭轉接器與轉接環; 鏡頭保護鏡; 鏡頭; 照明工具包; 遙控快門; 環形燈; 自拍棒
es: Electrónica > Comunicación > Telefonía > Accesorios para teléfonos móviles y inteligentes > Accesorios para cámaras de teléfonos móviles: Gimbals y estabilizadores; Empuñaduras y jaulas; Filtros del objetivo; Monturas de lentes y anillos adaptadores; Protectores de lentes; Lentes; Kits de iluminación; Persianas remotas; Luces de anillo; Palos para selfies
it: Elettronica > Comunicazioni > Telefonia > Accessori per cellulari e smartphone > Accessori per fotocamere di telefoni cellulari: Gimbal e stabilizzatori; Impugnature e gabbie; Filtri per obiettivo; Supporti per lenti e anelli adattatori; Protezioni per lenti; Lenti; Kit di illuminazione; Telecomandi per fotocamere; Luci ad anello; Bastoncini per selfie
sk-SK: Elektronika > Komunikačné zariadenia > Telefonovanie > Príslušenstvo pre mobilné telefóny a smartfóny > Príslušenstvo pre fotoaparáty mobilných telefónov: Gimbaly a stabilizátory; Rukoväte a klietky; Filtre objektívu; Objektívové adaptéry a adaptačné krúžky; Ochranné kryty objektívu; Objektívy; Súpravy osvetlenia; Diaľkové ovládače; Kruhové svetlá; Selfie tyče
en: Electronics > Communications > Telephony > Mobile & Smart Phone Accessories > Mobile Phone Camera Accessories: Gimbals & Stabilizers; Grips & Cages; Lens Filters; Lens Mounts & Adapter Rings; Lens Protectors; Lenses; Lighting Kits; Remote Shutters; Ring Lights; Selfie Sticks
de: Elektronik > Kommunikationsgeräte > Telefone > Zubehör für Mobiltelefone und Smartphones > Zubehör für Mobiltelefon-Kameras: Kardanringe & Stabilisatoren; Griffe & Käfige; Objektivfilter; Objektivhalterungen und Adapterringe; Objektivschutz; Linsen; Beleuchtungskits; Fernbedienter Verschluss; Ringlichter; Selfie-Sticks
tr: Elektronik > Haberleşme > Telefon İletişimi > Cep Telefonu ve Akıllı Telefon Aksesuarları > Cep Telefonu Kamera Lensleri: Gimballer ve Stabilizatörler; Saplar ve Kafesler; Lens Filtreleri; Lens Montaj ve Adaptör Halkaları; Lens Koruyucuları; Lensler; Aydınlatma Kitleri; Uzaktan Deklanşör; Halka Işıklar; Selfie Çubukları